Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 10 Canvassing the Lists of Qualified Electors

17-10-1.
Maintenance of registration — Inactive file.

The local board or its duly authorized agent shall maintain the files of registration cards in a condition that will correctly represent the registration of qualified voters at all times. It shall continually purge the cards of voters no longer qualified to vote in the city or town. It shall promptly record all changes of address, changes of name, and transfers and cancellations of registration.

If a confirmation card has been mailed to a registered voter at an address outside of the city or town of the voter’s current registered address for voting purposes, or if the confirmation card has been mailed to an address within the same city or town where the voter is registered, which card was sent to confirm the voter’s continuing residence within the city or town and not merely to confirm information provided by or through the postal service concerning a change of address within the city or town, and in both cases the voter has failed to respond to the confirmation card, the voter shall be stricken from the voting list and the voter registration shall be canceled if the voter has not voted or appeared to vote in an election during the period beginning on the date of mailing of the confirmation card and ending on the date after the date of the second general election that occurs after the date of mailing of the card. Provided, that the registration of any person shall not be canceled during his or her service in the armed forces of the United States and during two (2) years thereafter. A voter whose registration has been canceled shall not thereafter be eligible to vote unless that voter shall again register in accordance with the provisions of this title and in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution of this state. The local board shall notify the secretary of state of any cancellation. The local board shall notify each voter whose registration has been canceled by a notice addressed to the voter at the voter’s last known address, and a memorandum that the notice has been sent shall be maintained on file by the local board. The local board shall take affirmative action to purge the voter’s name from its files of registration cards.

Using the central voter registration system, upon receipt of the monthly list of individuals who have died from the office of vital statistics, as prescribed by §

23-3-5

or provided by the federal Social Security Administration’s master death list, the secretary of state shall identify all voter registrations that may be reflected on the list and so notify electronically, the local board of canvassers of each applicable city or town. The local board, upon receipt of the list of deceased persons from the secretary of state, or upon receipt of an affidavit of death on forms prescribed by the secretary of state, shall promptly purge its files of registration cards by removing the cards of each deceased elector and canceling the voter registration information of the deceased elector from the central voter registration system.

The local board shall maintain a separate list of all new registrations and all transfers of registration which are received by the board within the thirty-day (30) period prior to the close of registration prior to each primary, regular, and special election. The list shall be maintained until the time that the election is held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2870, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3746, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-9-26; G.L., §

17-10-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 4; P.L. 1965, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 1989, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 3, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 3, effective June 7, 2022.

17-10-2.
Right to vote unprejudiced by errors.

A voter’s registration shall not be invalidated nor the voter’s right to vote be prejudiced by any error in filing registration cards or in the preparation of lists of voters or in making any change or transfer in the records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-7

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-2

.

17-10-3.
Publication of preliminary lists.

Immediately after the close of registration for each general election and each primary election for a general election, the local board shall publish and post a preliminary list of all persons who appear from the registration cards to be duly registered to vote at the next ensuing election. The preliminary list for a primary election shall be subject to the requirements of chapter 13 of this title. The preliminary list shall contain the names and addresses of registered voters arranged in the same order as the file of original registration cards. The preliminary list shall be computer generated from the statewide central voter registry system. The list shall be available for public inspection at the local board of canvassers, where the list shall be open to examination at all reasonable times. The local board shall, upon request, furnish without charge and without unreasonable delay, five (5) copies of the preliminary list to the state, city, or town chairperson of any political party.

The preliminary list shall be deemed a public record; and any elector of the city or town, upon request, shall be given a copy of the list upon payment of no more than the actual cost of reproduction.

The preliminary list shall contain the following language in bold print:

“You must be registered to vote from your actual place of residence.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, §§ 5, 7; P.L. 1952, ch. 2897, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

17-10-10

,

17-10-11

, 17-10-26; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 152, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5; P.L. 1986, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 96, § 1.

17-10-4.
Defacement of posted lists.

Every person who unlawfully takes down, defaces, or destroys any list of voters posted up as provided in §

17-10-3

shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 8, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 5; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 8, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-12

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 7; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-4

.

17-10-5.
Canvass and correction of preliminary lists.

The local board shall, before the twentieth (20th) day preceding each election, meet and canvass the preliminary lists and hear objections to the inclusion or omission of any person as a registered voter, and it shall at that time make a final canvass and correction of the registration files. It shall give notice of the time and place of the meeting, for at least ten (10) days previous to it, by posting notices of the meeting in the same manner as required by this chapter for the posting of the preliminary list, and by publication once, at least ten (10) days previous to the meeting on the official website maintained by the city or town. At or following the meeting, the local board shall strike from the lists and direct the cancellation of the registration of every person who is not qualified to vote at the election for which the final canvass is made, and shall immediately notify the secretary of state of that action. No registration shall be cancelled or a voter’s right to vote be otherwise limited based upon a finding that the voter no longer resides within the city or town unless the voter has confirmed either in person or in writing that the voter no longer resides within the city or town or the board has received written evidence that the voter has registered to vote within another city or town or in another state.

The local boards may meet and canvass the voting lists of any senatorial district, representative district or districts, ward or wards, or voting district or districts in any senatorial or representative district, ward, or voting district, or at their office or other previously designated place, at any other convenient time or times, on the same day or different days, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 3; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 8, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 3; P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 6; P.L. 1952, ch. 2897, § 2; P.L. 1956, ch. 3746, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

17-10-8

,

17-10-14

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 4; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 6; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 7; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-5

; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 8, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 40, § 1, effective June 8, 2022.

17-10-6.
Evidence given at final canvass.

Any qualified elector shall have the right to appear before the local board on the date set for final canvass and give evidence concerning the correctness of the preliminary registration list. Upon the basis of all the evidence, the local board shall make any further corrections in the registration records that it may find necessary. A stenographic record or electronic audio recording shall be taken at the proceedings and maintained as a permanent record of the board of canvassers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3746, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-15

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-6

; P.L. 2022, ch. 102, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 103, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

17-10-7.
Proof required to strike name.

No name shall be stricken from any voting list by any local board upon evidence given at the final canvass meeting unless sworn proof is presented to the board that that name is the name of a person not qualified to vote at the election for which the registration and voting list is being canvassed. No name shall be stricken for ineligibility to vote on the basis of residence except as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3746, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-17

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-7

; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5.

17-10-8.
Notice of striking of names.

In each city and town the local board shall, within one hundred and twenty (120) hours after striking the name of any person from any registration or voting list, cause to be mailed to the person, postage prepaid, at that person’s last address in the registration records, a notice of the striking of his or her name, and the reason for the striking; except that the notice provided for in this section shall not be required where the voter has requested the action, or has died.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3746, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-18

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 312, § 1.

17-10-9.
Record of vote on adding or striking names.

The clerk of the local board shall record the votes of the members of the board on adding or striking the name of any person from the list of voters whenever requested to do so by any member of the board or by any qualified elector of the city or town present at the time of canvassing, a certified copy of this record shall be evidence of the facts stated in it; and for any willful neglect on the part of the clerk to make a record, whenever requested as provided in this section, the clerk shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-19

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 7; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-9

.

17-10-10.
Corrections by state board.

The state board may request any local board to make any correction in any voting list, and if the local board does not immediately comply with the request, the state board may make the correction itself, and this correction shall not be changed except on order of the supreme court. Any person whose name is stricken from any voting list by the state board may file a petition as from an action of the local board as provided in this chapter. The state board shall notify the secretary of state of the action. The state board, in ordering the striking of any names from a voting list, shall be subject to the same requirements and limitations as are applicable to local boards, including but not limited to, the provisions of §

17-10-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 17; P.L. 1940, ch. 817, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-20

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-10

; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5.

17-10-11.
Right to appeal striking of name.

Whenever the local board of any town or city at any meeting held for the purpose of canvassing the rights and correcting the lists of voters rejects, or causes to be stricken from the voting list, the name of any person qualified to vote, the person whose name the board has rejected or stricken from any list may appeal to the state board of elections, setting forth his or her residence, his or her qualifications, and other facts in connection with the rejection or striking of his or her name from the list, as that person may deem material, and praying that his or her name is added to the list.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 583, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1226; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 11; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 8, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 817, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-21

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-11

; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5.

17-10-12.
Notification to local board members and clerk.

Upon the filing of the appeal, the state board of elections shall immediately cause the members and clerk of the local board to appear before the state board, at a time and place to be set by the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 583, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1226, 1227; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 30; G.L., ch. 8, § 12; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 8, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-22

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-12

; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5.

17-10-13.
Dismissal of appeal — Order entering name on lists.

If, upon a hearing, the state board finds that the name of the appellant is not entitled to be placed or to remain upon the voting list, the appeal shall be dismissed. If, however, the state board finds that the name of the appellant is entitled to be placed upon the voting list, the board shall order the name to be placed upon that list pursuant to §

17-7-5(a)(3)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 583, § 3; C.P.A. 1905, § 1227; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 31; G.L., ch. 8, § 13; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 8, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-23

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-13

; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5.

17-10-14.
Final list — Certification.

The registration, as finally corrected pursuant to this chapter, shall constitute the voting list to be used at the election for which it has been canvassed, and shall be certified for use pursuant to chapter 19 of this title. Only the original of the list needs to be signed by the board of canvassers, and copies of the list may be certified by a duly placed stamp on the copy. The voting list shall be deemed a public record; and a copy of the list shall be made available, upon request, to any elector within the city or town upon payment of no more than the actual cost of reproduction. Notwithstanding certification of the results of the final canvass, persons who subsequently become ineligible to vote for failure to comply with the provisions of §

17-9.1-25

shall not be permitted to vote in the election unless and until their residency is established pursuant to that section. The names of those persons shall be placed on the inactive list.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3746, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-24

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-15

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-14

; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5; P.L. 1985, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5.

17-10-15.
Use of registration cards at polls.

The local board shall remove from the container used for that purpose the original registration cards of persons found by the board not to be qualified to vote at the election for which the registry has been canvassed pursuant to this chapter. These removed cards shall be carefully preserved in a separate file to be maintained for that purpose. At that time, the remaining cards shall be secured in their container so that no card may be removed without breaking a seal or otherwise making it appear that a card has been tampered with. The local board shall certify that the cards are a true and complete list of all qualified voters of the voting district as of the date of the certificate, and shall insert the certificate at the front of the container.

A complete list of all qualified voters of each voting district who are eligible to vote in each voting district in the election, as certified by the local board, shall then be delivered to the warden of each polling place to be used as the certified voting list for each voting district. The certified list of voters for each voting district shall be signed and/or otherwise certified by the local board in accordance with regulations to be adopted by the state board. The local board may divide the registration of any voting district into two (2) or more sections for greater convenience of use at the polls. In addition, each warden shall be provided with a certified list of all voters eligible to vote in the election in the entire city or town, and this list shall be signed and/or otherwise certified by the local board in accordance with regulations to be adopted by the state board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 15; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-30; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-16

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1: G.L., §

17-10-15

; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5.

17-10-16.
Challenge lists.

The local board shall prepare and annex a “challenge list” to each of these canvassed and certified voting lists. The challenge list shall consist of the names and addresses of all persons who are determined to be ineligible to vote in the ensuing election at any time after the final list of eligible voters has been certified by the local board. The challenge list shall also contain the names and addresses of all persons who have been furnished mail ballots. The challenge list shall also contain the names and addresses of all persons who, after the final list of voters eligible to participate in the election have been certified, become ineligible to vote for failure to comply with §

17-9.1-25

. Provided, that the state board, by regulation, may authorize local boards to code the certified list provided to voting district wardens to indicate the ineligibility of a voter or the status of a voter as a mail ballot voter, or the status of a voter as an inactive voter. Copies of the challenge lists shall be furnished to political party workers at each polling place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 5.

17-10-17.
Change of registration records on change of voting district boundaries.

When the boundaries of any voting district are changed, it shall be the duty of the local board to correct the registration cards and voting lists and to transfer the cards of the registered voters affected by the change, and to notify the voters by mail, postage prepaid, of the transfer and change. The local board shall also notify the secretary of state of the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-6

; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-18

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-17

.

17-10-18.
Temporary registration certificates.

Temporary registration certificates may be issued by a local board upon proof by any qualified voter that the voter’s registration card has been erroneously removed from the voting list. The temporary certificates shall be issued under the conditions and in the manner prescribed in chapter 19 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1: G.L., §

17-10-18

.

17-10-19.
False entry or erasure with intent to change voting rights.

Every person who, at any time, willfully or fraudulently adds a name to a list of voters or erases any name from the list after the list has been corrected for certification pursuant to law, or makes an entry in the registry book or on an original or duplicate card with the intent to permit a person to vote who is not qualified to vote, or to deprive a qualified elector of his or her right to vote, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 31; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-41; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-20

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 7; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1: G.L., §

17-10-19

.

17-10-20.
Neglect of duty by public officers.

Any public officer upon whom a duty is imposed by this chapter or chapter 9.1 of this title, who willfully neglects to perform the duty, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 30; P.L. 1956, ch. 3734, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-42; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-21

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 7; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1: G.L., §

17-10-20

.

17-10-21.
Right to vote or validity of election unaffected by neglect of duty.

The failure of any local board to perform any of its duties required by law shall not affect the validity of an election or a financial town meeting or the right of any person to vote, except as the right to vote may be affected by noncompliance with chapters 1 and 9.1 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 24; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-43; G.L. 1956, §

17-10-22

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-21

; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 5.

17-10-22.
Certified copies of lists of persons voting.

Every clerk of a local board, upon payment or tender of his or her legal fees, shall furnish to any one demanding it a certified copy of any list of voters whose votes have been given in any election.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 7, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, § 25; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 7, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 26; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-47; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-26; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1: G.L., §

17-10-22

.

17-10-23.
Certified copies of registration records.

Every clerk of a local board shall, upon payment or tender, furnish to any person demanding it a certified copy of any registration of voters, and every town clerk shall also, upon request of any person and tender of legal fees, and without any unreasonable delay, examine the records and certify to the estate of any person, and shall furnish copies of any instrument or writing which may be on record or in the files of his or her office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 7, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, § 26; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 7, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 27; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-48; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-27; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; G.L., §

17-10-23

.

17-10-24 — 17-10-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 7, §§ 6, 14, 15, 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, §§ 6, 14, 15, 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, §§ 19, 27 — 29; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 7, §§ 19, 27 — 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, §§ 20, 28 — 30; G.L. 1956, §§ 17-10-49 — 17-10-52; G.L. 1956, §§

17-10-28

— 17-10-31; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; G.L., §§

17-10-24

— 17-10-27; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 7; P.L. 1978, ch. 203, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 312, § 2.

17-10-28 — 17-10-31.
[Renumbered.]